Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
122A

HAWAII
STATE DEFENSE FORCE

Section

122A-1 Short title

122A-2 Hawaii state defense force established

122A-3 Rules

122A-4 Composition; enlistment; appointment

122A-5 Uniform; rank precedence and command

122A-6 Discipline

122A-7 Discharge; dismissal

122A-8 Pay and allowances

122A-9 Arms and equipment; facilities

122A-10 Training

122A-11 Employment

122A-12 Federal service

122A-13 Civil groups

122A-14 Acceptance of gratuities

122A-15 Immunities

122A-16 Courts-martial; nonjudicial punishment

Note

Chapter title amended
by L 1988, c 135, §1.

Cross References

Civil relief for
state military forces, see chapter 657D.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next